Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-21,284
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Successor Asbestos-Related
Liability Act:

(1) Asbestos claim means
any claim, wherever or whenever made, for damages, losses, indemnification,
contribution, or other relief arising out of, based on, or in any way related
to asbestos, including:

(a)
Any claim involving the health effects of exposure to asbestos, including
a claim for personal injury or death, mental or emotional injury, risk of
disease or other injury, or the costs of medical monitoring or surveillance;

(b) Any claim made by
or on behalf of any person exposed to asbestos, or a representative, spouse,
parent, child, or other relative of the person; and

(c) Any claim for damage or loss
caused by the installation, presence, or removal of asbestos;

(2) Corporation means
a corporation for profit, including a domestic corporation organized under
the laws of this state or a foreign corporation organized under laws other
than the laws of this state;

(3) Successor asbestos-related liabilities means liabilities,
whether known or unknown, asserted or unasserted, absolute or contingent,
accrued or unaccrued, liquidated or unliquidated, or due or to become due,
that are related to asbestos claims and were assumed or incurred by a corporation
as a result of or in connection with a merger or consolidation, or the plan
of merger or consolidation related to the merger or consolidation with or
into another corporation, or that are related in any way to asbestos claims
based on the exercise of control or the ownership of stock of the corporation
before the merger or consolidation. Successor asbestos-related liabilities
includes liabilities that, after the time of the merger or consolidation for
which the fair market value of total gross assets is determined under section 25-21,287,
were or are paid or otherwise discharged, or committed to be paid or otherwise
discharged, by or on behalf of the corporation, or by a successor corporation,
or by or on behalf of a transferor, in connection with settlements, judgments,
or other discharges in this state or another jurisdiction;

(4) Successor corporation
means a corporation that assumes or incurs or has assumed or incurred successor
asbestos-related liabilities that is a successor and became a successor before
January 1, 1972, or is any of that successor corporation's successors; and

(5) Transferor means
a corporation from which successor asbestos-related liabilities are or were
assumed or incurred.

Laws 2010, LB763, § 2.